Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1 General Provisions
4-31-108. Program loans — Comptroller's certification — Handling of funds.

The comptroller of the treasury shall file a certificate with the authority setting forth with respect to each local government unit that will receive a program loan:

The name of such local government unit;

The amount of such program loan;

That the loan program agreement pursuant to which the program loan to be made is entered into pursuant to, and in accordance with, title 68, chapter 221, part 2 or part 5, [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed], or part 4 of this chapter as the case may be;

The total, at the time of approval of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, of all program loans under the state loan programs made to the local government unit, whether financed from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued pursuant to § 4-31-107 or from the proceeds of general obligation bonds or bond anticipation notes of the state;

The total amount, at the time of approval of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, of payments to the state required to be made in each fiscal year of the state under loan program agreements, excluding payments that will be required on account of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, or under contracts providing for program loans from the proceeds of general obligation bonds or bond anticipation notes;

The amount of state-shared taxes received in the prior fiscal year of the state as shown by the latest completed audit for the state's fiscal year preceding the time of approval of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates;

The amount, at the time of approval of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, of indebtedness, other than under loan program agreements, having a prior lien on state-shared taxes as certified by the local government unit; and

The total amount, at the time of approval of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, of payments to the state required to be made in each fiscal year of the state under loan program agreements, including payments that will be required on account of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, and under contracts providing for program loans from the proceeds of general obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes.

In the preparation of the certificate required by subsection (a), the comptroller of the treasury, in determining the amount of payments to the state required to be made in each fiscal year of the state under loan program agreements, including the loan program agreement with respect to which such certificate relates, and under contracts providing for program loans from the proceeds of general obligation bonds or bond anticipation notes, shall:

With respect to program loans that have been funded from the proceeds of bonds of the authority or the proceeds of general obligation bonds of the state, utilize the actual debt service requirements under such loan program agreements or contracts; and

With respect to program loans for which no funding has yet been provided or for which interim financing from the proceeds of notes or from other available moneys is being provided, utilize the debt service requirements under such loan program agreements determined by the state funding board at the time of approval of such loan program agreement as if the bonds to be issued to fund such program loans will bear interest at such rate per annum and mature in such manner as the state funding board shall establish at the time of such approval.

Each certificate may relate to one (1) or more local government units, program loans, or both, and be prepared in such form and manner as the comptroller of the treasury deems advisable.

No proceeds of bonds or notes shall be applied by the authority to provide moneys to make a program loan to any local government unit unless the certificate of the comptroller of the treasury prepared pursuant to subsection (a) shows that the ratio of unobligated state-shared taxes to the maximum annual amount of program loan payments complies with the statutes governing the state loan programs.

For purposes of this subsection (d) and subsection (i):

“Maximum annual amount of program loan payments” means the total amount of payments to the state by such local government unit required to be made in any fiscal year of the state under loan program agreements determined as provided in this section, including payments that will be required on account of the program loan with respect to which such certificate relates, and under contracts, other than loan program agreements, providing for program loans from the proceeds of general obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes; and

“Unobligated state-shared taxes” means the total amount of state-shared taxes shown in the certificate that such local government unit received in the prior fiscal year of the state as shown by the latest completed audit for the state's fiscal year, after deducting the amount of such state-shared taxes applied to other indebtedness of such local government unit in such fiscal year.

Prior to the issuance of bonds pursuant to § 4-31-107, the comptroller of the treasury shall file with the authority a certificate:

Setting forth the total amount of bonds to be issued, stating separately:

The amount from proceeds of the proposed bonds allocable to program loans, whether to finance a program loan or to retire notes theretofore issued to finance a program loan;

The estimated amount, if any, in order to provide for the payment of interest on such bonds for a stated period after issuance;

The estimated amount, if any, required to establish reserves;

The estimated amount, if any, required to provide for the payment of costs incident to the issuance of such bonds; and

Certifying, with respect to each local government unit to which a program loan is to be made or refinanced from the proceeds of such bonds, that a loan program agreement is in effect, that the certificate required pursuant to subsection (a) with respect to each such program loan has been filed with the authority, and that the aggregate of the payments to be made to the state by all local government units under all loan program agreements will be sufficient, together with other funds available for such purpose, to pay the principal of, and interest and premium, if any, on all bonds issued to finance program loans and to fulfill any and all other obligations of the authority.

Prior to the issuance of notes pursuant to § 4-31-107, the comptroller of the treasury shall file with the authority a certificate:

Setting forth the total amount of notes to be issued, stating separately:

The amount from the proceeds of the proposed notes allocable to program loans, whether to finance a program loan or to retire other notes theretofore issued to finance a program loan;

The estimated amount, if any, in order to provide for the payment of interest on such notes for a stated period after issuance;

The estimated amount, if any, required to establish reserves;

The estimated amount, if any, required to provide for the payment of costs incident to the issuance of such notes; and

Certifying, with respect to local government units to which program loans are to be made from at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the proceeds of such notes available for program loans, that the loan program agreements are in effect and that the issuance of such notes will not affect the ability of the authority to pay the principal of, interest and premium, if any, on any bonds of the authority issued to finance program loans and to fulfill any and all other obligations of the authority.

Pending application of the proceeds of bonds or notes to provide program loans as provided herein, such proceeds shall be held in trust for the benefit of the holders of such bonds or notes, as the case may be.

The authority is hereby authorized to establish in the state treasury a separate special trust fund of the authority for each separate issue of bonds or notes that is similarly secured, to be known as the “state loan programs fund” and to bear such additional designation as the authority deems appropriate to properly identify each fund. The state hereby covenants and agrees that from and after the issuance of any bonds or notes under and pursuant to § 4-31-107 then, notwithstanding any other law, and particularly title 68, chapter 221, parts 2 and 5, and [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed], moneys derived by the state from payments made by local government units pursuant to loan program agreements with such local government units and moneys withheld from state-shared taxes apportioned to such local government units as permitted under the terms of the state loan programs that are pledged to the payment of such bonds or notes shall be paid into the particular state loan programs fund established for the issuance of bonds or notes to which such moneys are pledged, and such moneys shall be accounted for separately from all other moneys in the state treasury and shall be applied by the authority solely for the purpose of paying principal of and interest and premium, if any, on such issue of bonds and notes issued pursuant to § 4-31-107, refunding moneys due to participating local government units where appropriate, and paying all other costs incidental to the administration of the authority in connection with the state loan programs and the issuance of such issue of bonds and notes.

There is hereby established a separate special trust fund of the state to be known as the “local development authority statutory reserve fund.”

There shall be deposited in such statutory reserve fund all moneys from whatever source, including appropriations pursuant to law, received by the authority for such purpose.

The statutory reserve fund shall be established and maintained in an amount equal to the statutory reserve fund requirement.

For purposes of this subsection (i):

“Program loan certificate” means the certificate of the comptroller of the treasury prepared pursuant to subsection (a);

“Statutory reserve fund requirement” means the total amount obtained by adding the amount for each program loan arrived at by subtracting the total unobligated state-shared taxes shown on the program loan certificate relating to such program loan from the maximum annual amount of payments shown on the program loan certificate relating to such program loan.

At the end of each calendar year, the authority shall certify to the governor the amount of the deficiency, if any, on deposit in the statutory reserve fund, valuing investments in such fund at face value, and there shall be included in the governor's recommended budget next submitted to the general assembly a line item appropriation in the amount equal to the deficiency in the amount required to be on deposit in the statutory reserve fund, which amount, if appropriated, shall be apportioned and paid to the authority for deposit in the statutory reserve fund.

Moneys on deposit in the statutory reserve fund shall be invested and reinvested from time to time by the authority in securities and obligations deemed appropriate by the authority, including securities or obligations, the interest on which is exempt from federal income taxes. Any earnings from such investment and reinvestment shall accrue to the benefit of the statutory reserve fund; provided, that at the end of each fiscal year, any amount in such fund in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of the amount required hereby to be maintained in such fund shall revert to the general fund in accordance with the applicable provisions of the general appropriations bill.

The moneys held in the statutory reserve fund shall be a trust fund for the benefit of the holders of the bonds and notes of the authority issued pursuant to § 4-31-107, and shall be paid to the authority, upon request of the authority, whenever any local government unit shall fail to make a payment required under a program loan agreement and there are insufficient state-shared taxes available to the authority to be withheld as permitted under the state loan programs to permit the payment of principal of or interest on bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to § 4-31-107 in accordance with the terms of such bonds or notes.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 8; T.C.A., § 4-3708; Acts 1981, ch. 128, § 1; 1982, ch. 873, § 14; 1984, ch. 965, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 846, § 12; 2003, ch. 355, § 57.

Compiler's Notes. Title 68, chapter 211, part 4, referred to in this section and concerning resource and energy recovery, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 846, § 48, effective July 1, 1996.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

4-31-109. Bonds and notes — Issuance to fund pollution control facilities.

For the purpose of providing moneys to assist small business concerns in financing pollution control facilities, the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority in such principal amounts as may from time to time be authorized by law.

The proceeds of such bonds and notes may be loaned by the authority to a small business concern pursuant to a small business financing agreement and applied by such small business concern solely to the payment of the cost of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering or extending any pollution control facilities of such small business concern, including the payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with such pollution control facilities and the issuance of the bonds or notes, or may be applied by the authority to the payment of the cost of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering, or extending any pollution control facilities of such small business concern, including the payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with such pollution control facilities and the issuance of the bonds or notes, and, in either case, there may be reserved sufficient proceeds of such bonds or notes to provide for the payment of interest on the bonds or notes during construction of any such pollution control facilities and for six (6) months after the estimated date of completion, and for the establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds or notes in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for such payment.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to any other provision of this chapter or other law.

The authority has the power, and is hereby authorized, to issue from time to time renewal notes, and bonds to pay notes issued in anticipation of such bonds, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of refunding bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other authorized purpose.

Such refunding bonds and renewal notes may be issued without further authorization, such issuance being deemed authorized by the law authorizing the bonds and notes to be renewed, paid or refunded.

The refunding bonds shall be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, each issue of its notes or bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be limited special obligations of the authority payable solely from and secured by moneys derived by the authority from payments made by small business concerns pursuant to small business financing agreements with such small business concerns.

In addition, bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or part of the pollution control facilities financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes, including any enlargements of and additions to any such pollution control facilities thereafter made, or by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the authority interest in and rights under the small business financing agreement relating to such pollution control facilities, or any thereof, or by both such mortgage or deed of trust and such assignment and pledge.

The authority is hereby authorized to issue bonds and notes the principal amount of which to be outstanding at any one (1) time shall not exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), such bonds to be issued in the manner provided in this chapter to implement the provisions thereof relating to providing moneys to assist small business concerns in financing pollution control facilities.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 9; T.C.A., § 4-3109; Acts 1982, ch. 873, § 15.

4-31-110. Bonds and notes issued under § 4-31-109 — Limitations.

Prior to the issuance of bonds or notes pursuant to § 4-31-109, the industrial development authority shall file with the authority a certificate to the effect that the pollution control facilities to be financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes constitute pollution control facilities as defined in this chapter, and that assisting the small business concern in financing such pollution control facilities is in furtherance of the public purpose of abating or controlling pollution in the state.

Such certificate by an officer of the industrial development authority shall be conclusive evidence that the pollution control facilities to be financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes are pollution control facilities that may properly be financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes.

No bonds or notes shall be authorized by the authority under § 4-31-109 to provide moneys to assist a small business concern in financing pollution control facilities, unless the aforementioned certificate by an officer of the industrial development authority shall have been filed with the authority, and the authority shall receive evidence, as it deems sufficient, that the payments of all moneys by such small business concern that are due under the small business financing agreement entered into by such small business concern and the authority have been guaranteed by the small business administration of the United States under the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq.), and Small Business Investment Act of 1958 (15 U.S.C. § 661 et seq.), or otherwise.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 10; T.C.A., § 4-3110.

4-31-111. Bonds and notes — Holders' rights preserved.

The state does hereby covenant and agree with the holders of any bonds or notes issued under this chapter, that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders thereof, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such bonds or notes, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 12; T.C.A., § 4-3111.

4-31-112. Bonds and notes — Negotiable instruments.

Whether or not the bonds or notes issued under this chapter are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law, title 47, chapter 3, such bonds or notes shall be and hereby are made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the negotiable instruments law, subject only to the provisions of the bonds or notes for registration.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 13; T.C.A., § 4-3112.

Cross-References. Uniform commercial code, title 47, chs. 1-9.

4-31-113. Bonds and notes — Tax exemption.

The state covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of bonds and notes issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter, in consideration of the acceptance of and payment therefor, the bonds and notes of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter, and the income therefrom, and all moneys received or to be received by the authority and pledged to pay or to secure the payment of such bonds or notes shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local governmental unit or other political corporations or subdivisions thereof, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 14; T.C.A., § 4-3113.

4-31-114. Bonds and notes — Legal investments and lawful security.

The bonds and notes issued pursuant to this chapter shall be and are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, trustees, guardians and for all public funds of the state, any local government unit or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state.

Such bonds and notes shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of the state and all public funds of local government units or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state, and such bonds and notes shall be lawful and sufficient security for these deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appertaining thereto.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 15; T.C.A., § 4-3114.

4-31-115. Powers supplemental — Construction.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition to the powers conferred by other laws, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law, general or special, and, except as provided herein, bonds and notes may be issued hereunder notwithstanding any other such law and without regard to the procedure required by any other such law.

Insofar as this chapter is inconsistent with any other law, general or special, this chapter shall be controlling.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 16; T.C.A., § 4-3115.

4-31-116. Expenses.

Expenses incurred by the authority in carrying out each of the programs authorized by this chapter may be made payable from funds made available to each program pursuant to this chapter, and no liability shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been so provided.

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 10.

4-31-117. Annual report and audit.

The authority shall, following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the governor and the speakers of each house of the general assembly.

The report shall set forth a separate and complete operating and financial statement for each of the programs authorized by this chapter.

The annual report, including financial statements, all books, accounts and financial records of the authority shall be audited annually by the comptroller of the treasury.

All audits performed by the internal audit staff of the authority shall be performed in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 11; 1984, ch. 794, § 2; 2004, ch. 656, § 1.

Textbooks. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-31-118. Loans for acquisition and improvement of mental health and developmental disability facilities.

The authority may enter into loan agreements with any local government unit and any local government unit may enter into loan agreements with the authority for loans for acquisitions and improvement of facilities previously financed under part 7 of this chapter.

Any loan agreement may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the local government and shall additionally include, in substance, the following:

The amount of the loan as determined by the authority;

An agreement by the authority to pay part of the amount of the loan to the local government unit during the progress of the acquisition or improvement, or to pay the amount of the loan following completion of the acquisition or improvement, as may be agreed upon by the parties; and

An agreement by the local government unit:

To proceed expeditiously with and complete the project;

To commence operation of the project on its completion, and not to discontinue operations or dispose of the project without the approval of the authority;

To operate and maintain the project in accordance with applicable provisions of this part and in compliance with rules and regulations of the authority;

Not to contract with any corporation for profit, private person or firm for that operation of the same notwithstanding any law authorizing such contracts, except upon approval by the authority of an application to the authority;

To pledge any available sources of revenue to make payment according to a schedule established by the authority, and to make such payments; and

To establish and maintain adequate financial records for the project, and to cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and to furnish a copy of such audits to the comptroller.

The authority may promulgate any additional rules or regulations concerning the contract and charges in operations of a capital project.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 65.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

4-31-119. Authority of the Tennessee local development authority to allocate the national qualified energy conservation bond limitation
— Administration of programs
— Issuance of bonds for qualified energy conservation projects.

The state delegates to the Tennessee local development authority the authority to allocate on behalf of the state the portion of the “national qualified energy conservation bond limitation,” as defined in § 54D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 54D [repealed]), that is allocated to the state pursuant to § 54D, in a manner consistent therewith. The authority may make such allocations from a list of recommended allocations presented to it by the department of environment and conservation. The department shall consider both state and local government projects and issuers when developing recommendations.

The department of environment and conservation shall serve as the coordinator and administrator of such qualified energy conservation bond programs, establishing the terms and provisions of the programs and adopting such procedures with respect to such programs as necessary or appropriate.

The authority has the power and is authorized to issue its negotiable bonds for a qualified energy conservation project as a capital project under part 4 of this chapter if the commissioner of environment and conservation certifies that such project complies with a qualified energy conservation bond program developed by the department, which certification shall be conclusive. In applying § 47-14-103, and related provisions of title 47, chapter 14, to such bonds issued by the authority, the effective rate of the interest on any such bond shall be determined by reducing the interest payable by the authority with respect to such bond by the amount of payments from the United States treasury department that the authority expected, at the time of the issuance of such bond, to receive with respect to such bond.

Acts 2009, ch. 608, § 6; 2012, ch. 957, § 2; 2016, ch. 743, § 13.

Compiler’s Notes. Section 54D of the United States Code, referred to in (a), was repealed by Act Dec. 22, 2017, P.L. 115-97, Title I, Subtitle C, Part V, § 13404(a), 131 Stat. 2138, applicable to bonds issued after 12/31/2017, as provided by § 13404(d) of such Act, which appears as 26 USCS § 54 note. It provided for qualified energy conservation bonds.

4-31-120. Bonds and notes — Maintenance of tax-exempt status.

For the purpose of ensuring that the bonds or notes authorized under this chapter and issued after March 8, 2016, maintain their tax-exempt status as may be provided by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.), as amended, no state officer or employee or user of a capital project, pollution control facility, or any other property financed or refinanced, directly or indirectly, with the proceeds of such bonds or notes, including, but not limited to, borrowers under a program loan agreement, shall authorize or allow any change, amendment, or modification to a project or program financed or refinanced, directly or indirectly, with the proceeds of such bonds or notes which change, amendment, or modification would affect the tax-exempt status of such bonds or notes unless the change, amendment, or modification receives the prior approval of the office of state and local finance in the office of the comptroller of the treasury and the authority. Failure to receive such approval shall render any change, amendment, or modification null and void.

Acts 2016, ch. 571, § 1.